Vermont, session 2025-2026, S264.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(2) “Collective bargaining” or “bargaining collectively” means the
process of negotiating terms, tenure, or conditions of employment between the
State of Vermont, the Vermont State Colleges, the University of Vermont, or
the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs, or the Office of the Attorney
General and representatives of employees with the intent to arrive at an
agreement that, when reached, shall be reduced to writing.
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 2 of 14
* * *
(5) “State employee” means any individual employed on a permanent or
limited-status basis by the State of Vermont, the Vermont State Colleges, the
University of Vermont, the State’s Attorneys’ offices, the Office of the
Attorney General, or as a full-time deputy sheriff paid by the State pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 290(b), including permanent part-time employees, and an
individual whose work has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with,
any current labor dispute or because of any unfair labor practice, but excluding
an individual:
(A) exempt or excluded from the State classified service under the
provisions of section 311 of this title, except that the State Police in the
Department of Public Safety; employees of the Defender General, excluding
attorneys employed directly by the Defender General and attorneys contracted
to provide legal services; Assistant Attorneys General; deputy State’s
Attorneys; employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices; and full-time deputy
sheriffs paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 290(b) are included within
the meaning of “State employee”;
(B) employed in the Office of the Lieutenant Governor;
(C) employed as the legal assistant to the Attorney General
authorized by section 155 of this title;
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 3 of 14
(D) employed as a department or agency head or deputy officer not
included in section 311 of this title, head of an institution or as a division
director in the Agency of Administration, and similar positions in the Vermont
State Colleges or the University of Vermont;
(E) employed by any other person who is not an employer as defined
in subdivision (7) of this section;
(F) employed as a managerial employee;
(G) employed in the classified service as a private secretary within
the meaning of subdivision 311(a)(3) of this title;
(H) employed in the Department of Human Resources;
(I) employed in the Department of Finance and Management as a
budget and management analyst, a revenue research analyst, director of budget
and management operations, director of program formulation and evaluation,
and director of State information systems;
(J) determined after hearing by the Board, upon petition of any
individual desiring exclusion, of the employer, or of a collective bargaining
unit, to be in a position that is so inconsistent with the spirit and intent of this
chapter as to warrant exclusion; or
(K) employed as a confidential employee.
* * *
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 4 of 14
(7)(A) “Employer” means the State of Vermont, excluding the
Legislative and Judiciary Departments, represented by the Governor or
designee, the Office of the Defender General represented by the Defender
General or designee, the Office of the Attorney General represented by the
Attorney General or designee, Vermont State Colleges represented by the
Chancellor or designee, and the University of Vermont represented by the
President or designee.
* * *
(10) “Person” includes one or more individuals, the State of Vermont,
Vermont State Colleges, University of Vermont, Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs, the Office of the Attorney General, employee
organizations, labor organizations, partnerships, corporations, legal
representatives, trustees, or any other natural or legal entity whatsoever.
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 905 is amended to read:
§ 905. MANAGEMENT RIGHTS
(a) The Governor or designee for the State of Vermont, the Chancellor or
designee for the Vermont State Colleges, the President or designee for the
University of Vermont, and the Executive Director or designee for the
Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs, and the Attorney General or
designee for the Office of the Attorney General shall act as the employer
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 5 of 14
representatives in collective bargaining negotiations and administration. The
representative shall be responsible for ensuring consistency in the terms and
conditions in various agreements throughout the State service and ensuring
compatibility with merit system statutes and principles and shall not agree to
any terms or conditions for which there are not adequate funds available.
* * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 906 is amended to read:
§ 906. DESIGNATION OF MANAGERIAL, SUPERVISORY, AND
CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEES
(a) The Commissioner of Human Resources shall determine those positions
in the classified service whose incumbents the Commissioner believes should
be designated as managerial, supervisory, or confidential employees. Any
disputes arising from the determination shall be finally resolved by the Board.
(b)(1) The Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs may determine positions in the State’s Attorneys’ offices whose
incumbents the Executive Director believes should be designated as
managerial, supervisory, or confidential employees. Any disputes arising from
the determination shall be finally resolved by the Board.
(2) The Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs may designate as a confidential employee not more than one deputy
sheriff paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 290(b) who is assigned to the
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 6 of 14
Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs’ central office to serve as the
coordinator for the other State-paid deputies.
(c) The Attorney General may determine positions in the Office of the
Attorney General whose incumbents the Attorney General believes should be
designated as managerial, supervisory, or confidential employees. Any
disputes arising from the determination shall be finally resolved by the Board.
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 912 is added to read:
§ 912. DESIGNATION OF ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL;
STATEWIDE BARGAINING RIGHTS
Assistant Attorneys General shall be part of one or more statewide
bargaining units, as determined to be appropriate by the Board pursuant to
sections 927 and 941 of this chapter, for the purpose of bargaining collectively.
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 925 is amended to read:
§ 925. MEDIATION; FACT FINDING
* * *
(i)(1) In the case of the Vermont State Colleges or the University of
Vermont, if the dispute remains unresolved 20 days after transmittal of
findings and recommendations to the parties or within a time frame mutually
agreed upon by the parties that may be not more than an additional 30 days,
each party shall submit as a single package its last best offer on all disputed
issues to the Board. Each party’s last best offer shall be filed with the Board
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 7 of 14
under seal and shall be unsealed and placed in the public record only when
both parties’ last best offers are filed with the Board. The Board shall hold one
or more hearings. Within 30 days of after the certifications, the Board shall
select between the last best offers of the parties, considered in their entirety
without amendment.
(2)(A) In the case of the State of Vermont or, the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs, or the Office of the Attorney General, if the dispute
remains unresolved 20 days after transmittal of findings and recommendations
to the parties or within a time frame mutually agreed upon by the parties that
may be not more than an additional 30 days, each party shall submit as a single
package its last best offer on all disputed issues to the Board, or upon the
request of either party, to an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the parties. If
the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator, the American Arbitration Association
shall appoint a neutral third party to act as arbitrator.
(B)(i) Each party’s last best offer shall be filed with the Board or the
arbitrator under seal and shall be unsealed and placed in the public record only
when both parties’ last best offers are filed with the Board or the arbitrator.
(ii) A party’s last best offer shall not include a proposal to:
(I) provide alternative health coverage to retired State
employees that has not been agreed to pursuant to the provisions of subdivision
479(a)(2) of this title; or
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 8 of 14
(II) provide health coverage that includes a Medicare
Advantage plan or similar plan established pursuant to Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act unless the inclusion of the plan has been agreed to by both
parties.
(iii) The Board or the arbitrator shall hold one or more hearings.
Within 30 days of after the certifications, the Board or the arbitrator shall
select between the last best offers of the parties, considered in their entirety
without amendment.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (i) of this section:
(1) In the case of the Vermont State Colleges or the University of
Vermont, should the Board find the last best offers of both parties
unreasonable and likely to produce undesirable results, or likely to result in a
long-lasting negative impact upon the parties’ collective bargaining
relationship, then the Board may select the recommendation of the fact finder
under subsection (g) of this section as to those disputed issues submitted to the
Board in the last best offers.
(2) In the case of the State of Vermont or, the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs, or the Office of the Attorney General, should the Board
or the arbitrator find the last best offers of both parties unreasonable and likely
to produce undesirable results, or likely to result in a long-lasting negative
impact upon the parties’ collective bargaining relationship, then the Board or
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 9 of 14
the arbitrator may select the recommendation of the fact finder under
subsection (g) of this section as to those disputed issues submitted to the Board
or the arbitrator in the last best offers.
(k)(1) In the case of the University of Vermont or the Vermont State
Colleges, the decision of the Board shall be final and binding on each party.
(2) In the case of the State of Vermont or, the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs, or the Office of the Attorney General, the decision of
the Board or the arbitrator shall be final, and the terms of the chosen agreement
shall be binding on each party, subject to appropriations in accordance with
subsection 982(d) of this title.
(l) Nothing herein shall be construed to permit an arbitrator or the Board to
issue an order under subsection (i) of this section binding upon the parties that
is in conflict with any statute or any rule or regulation that is not bargainable.
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 982 is amended to read:
§ 982. AGREEMENTS; LIMITATIONS, RENEGOTIATION, AND
RENEWAL
* * *
(c)(1) Except in the case of the Vermont State Colleges or the University of
Vermont, agreements between the State and certified bargaining units that are
not arrived at under the provisions of subsection 925(i) of this title shall, after
ratification by the appropriate unit memberships, be submitted to the Governor
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 10 of 14
who shall request sufficient funds from the General Assembly to implement
the agreement. If the General Assembly appropriates sufficient funds, the
agreement shall become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year. If
the General Assembly appropriates a different amount of funds, the terms of
the agreement affected by that appropriation shall be renegotiated based on the
amount of funds actually appropriated by the General Assembly, and the
agreement with the negotiated changes shall become effective at the beginning
of the next fiscal year.
(2)(A) Agreements between the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs and the certified bargaining units that are not arrived at under the
provisions of subsection 925(i) of this title shall, after ratification by the
appropriate unit memberships, be submitted to the Governor and the General
Assembly.
(B) The Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys
and Sheriffs shall request sufficient funds from the General Assembly to
implement the agreement. If the General Assembly appropriates sufficient
funds, the agreement shall become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal
year. If the General Assembly appropriates a different amount of funds, the
terms of the agreement affected by that appropriation shall be renegotiated
based on the amount of funds actually appropriated by the General Assembly,
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 11 of 14
and the agreement with the negotiated changes shall become effective at the
beginning of the next fiscal year.
(3)(A) Agreements between the Office of the Attorney General and the
certified bargaining units that are not arrived at under the provisions of
subsection 925(i) of this title shall, after ratification by the appropriate unit
memberships, be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly.
(B) The Attorney General shall request sufficient funds from the
General Assembly to implement the agreement. If the General Assembly
appropriates sufficient funds, the agreement shall become effective at the
beginning of the next fiscal year. If the General Assembly appropriates a
different amount of funds, the terms of the agreement affected by that
appropriation shall be renegotiated based on the amount of funds actually
appropriated by the General Assembly, and the agreement with the negotiated
changes shall become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year.
(d) When the parties are unable to reach agreement on a collective
bargaining agreement, and the Vermont Labor Relations Board recommends
an agreement in accordance with subsection 925(k) of this title, the Board shall
determine the cost of the agreement selected and request the General Assembly
to appropriate the amount determined to be necessary to implement the
selected agreement. If the General Assembly chooses to appropriate sufficient
funds, the agreement shall become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 12 of 14
year. If the General Assembly appropriates less than the amount requested, the
terms of the agreement affected by the lesser appropriation shall be
renegotiated based on the amount of the funds actually appropriated, and the
agreement with the negotiated changes shall become effective at the beginning
of the next fiscal year.
* * *
(g) In the event the State of Vermont, the Department of State’s Attorneys
and Sheriffs, the Office of the Attorney General, the University of Vermont,
and the Vermont State Colleges as employer and the collective bargaining unit
are unable to arrive at an agreement and there is not an existing agreement in
effect, the existing contract shall remain in force until a new contract is ratified
by the parties. However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the parties
from agreeing to a modification of certain provisions of the existing contract
that, as amended, shall remain in effect until a new contract is ratified by the
parties.
* * *
Sec. 7. 3 V.S.A. § 153 is amended to read:
§ 153. GENERAL POWERS; DEPUTY, ASSISTANTS
* * *
(c) The Attorney General may appoint such Assistant Attorneys General
and Special Assistant Attorneys General as may be necessary for the proper
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 13 of 14
and efficient performance of his or her the department, and with the approval
of the Governor, fix their pay, including through collective bargaining pursuant
to chapter 27 of this title, if applicable, remove them at pleasure, and be
responsible for their acts. They shall have the same obligations, power, and
authority as the Deputy Attorney General except those relating to the absence
or disability of the Attorney General and vacancy in the Office of Attorney
General. Their appointments and the revocation thereof shall be in writing and
recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State. All Assistant Attorneys
General and Special Assistant Attorneys General shall be attorneys at law.
(d) The Attorney General shall prepare and submit a funding request to the
Governor and General Assembly for the purpose of securing General Fund
appropriations for any increased costs related to a collective bargaining
agreement and to the Office of the Attorney General’s contract bargaining and
administration.
Sec. 8. ADJUSTMENT FOR INITIAL CONTRACT
For increased costs related to the initial collective bargaining agreement that
the Office of the Attorney General enters into pursuant to this act, including
the costs of bargaining, implementation, and contract administration, the
Attorney General may prepare and submit a funding request to the General
Assembly during the budget adjustment process if the timing of the
VT LEG #385166 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.264
2026 Page 14 of 14
implementation of the agreement does not permit the Office of the Attorney
General to secure sufficient funding during the regular budgetary process.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385166 v.1